California, session 20252026, AB1953.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 9.3 (commencing with Section 8606) is added to Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 9.3. Emergency Registration for Short-Term Rentals8606. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Increasing access to short-term rentals during declared states of emergency would ensure the availability of sufficient temporary housing for displaced residents, evacuees, and emergency personnel.(b) Additional short-term rentals during an emergency promote public health and safety by enabling access to safe, lawful, and habitable lodging alternatives when traditional accommodations are unavailable or at capacity.(c) Short-term rentals allow housing flexibility for first responders, contractors, and relief workers supporting disaster operations and facilitates their emergency response and recovery efforts.(d) A state registration program that authorizes additional short-term rentals would advance the public interest through temporary adjustments that are narrowly tailored to address extraordinary and time-limited emergency circumstances.8606.1. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Eligible residential dwelling” means any residential dwelling in the state, except for the following:(1) Income-restricted affordable housing.(2) A residential dwelling that was withdrawn from rent or lease in accordance with Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section 7060) of Division 7 of Title 1.(3) Any building or area that is, or is used as, a retail, restaurant, or banquet space, an event center, a shipping container, an outdoor area including tipis and treehouses, a van or recreational vehicle, a living or sleeping quarter added in a garage, storage area, closet, hall, or utility space without benefit of permit, or a boat or similar watercraft.(b) “Office” means the Office of Emergency Services.8606.2. (a) (1) The office shall establish a public registration system.(2) The office shall adopt regulations to administer the a public registration system.(b) Notwithstanding any local law, registration pursuant to subdivision (a) shall authorize the registered party to immediately commence offering an eligible residential dwelling as a short-term rental during a declared state of emergency.8606.3. (a) A city, county, city and county, or any other political subdivision of the state shall not maintain, enforce, prescribe, or continue in effect any law, rule, regulation, requirement, standard, or other provision that prohibits an individual or entity that controls an eligible residential dwelling that has been registered pursuant to Section 8606.2 from offering that dwelling as a short-term rental during a declared state of emergency.(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be interpreted to supersede laws that are generally applicable to residential dwellings or short-term rentals, including, but not limited to, taxes, noise, and nuisance regulations.SEC. 2. Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13996) is added to Part 4.7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 2. Special Event Registration for Short-Term Rentals13996. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Tourism is a key contributor to the California economy, from big cities to farm communities.(b) Events, from sporting events and music festivals, to culture and culinary, are an increasingly important driver of the tourism economy.(c) Events that draw thousands of attendees benefit from flexible accommodations supply, including short-term rentals.(d) Ensuring that California can continue to host events will help maintain robust tourism tax collection, supporting public services statewide.13996.1. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Eligible residential dwelling” means any residential dwelling in the state, except for the following:(1) Income-restricted affordable housing.(2) A residential dwelling that was withdrawn from rent or lease in accordance with Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section 7060) of Division 7 of Title 1.(3) Any building or area that is, or is used as, a retail, restaurant, or banquet space, an event center, a shipping container, an outdoor area including tipis and treehouses, a van or recreational vehicle, a living or sleeping quarter added in a garage, storage area, closet, hall, or utility space without benefit of permit, or a boat or similar watercraft.(b) “Office” means the Office of Tourism, also popularly referred to as the Division of Tourism, within the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.13996.2. (a) (1) The office shall establish a public registration system.(2) The office shall adopt regulations to administer the public registration system.(b) Notwithstanding any local law, registration pursuant to subdivision (a) shall authorize the registered party to immediately commence offering an eligible residential dwelling as a short-term rental during a special event period, as described in subdivision (c).(c) A special event period commences seven days prior to, and ends five days after, the following events:(1) Olympic Games.(2) Any other special event that the office determines, in its discretion, would benefit from additional transient lodging capacity.(d) Specific special event periods for the events listed in subdivision (c) shall be defined by the office and posted online at least 180 days prior to the commencement of the event period.13996.3. (a) A city, county, city and county, or any other political subdivision of the state shall not maintain, enforce, prescribe, or continue in effect any law, rule, regulation, requirement, standard, or other provision that prohibits an individual or entity that controls an eligible residential dwelling that has been registered pursuant to Section 13996.2 from offering that dwelling as a short-term rental during the special event period.(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be interpreted to supersede laws that are generally applicable to residential dwellings or short-term rentals, including, but not limited to, taxes, noise, and nuisance regulations.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that to ensure the availability of sufficient temporary housing during declared states of emergency and special events, the prohibition on short-term rental caps as specified in this act is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 and 2 of this act adding Article 9.3 (commencing with Section 8606) to Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13996) to Part 4.7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SECTION 1.Section 50991 of the Government Code is amended to read:50991.For the purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions shall apply:(a)“Hotel” means a commercially operated hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or similar transient lodging establishment, when all or part of the transient occupancy is or would be subject to tax under Section 7280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. For purposes of this chapter, a “hotel” shall not include a short-term rental facilitator as defined in subdivision (g).(b)“Local agency” means a city, county, or city and county.(c)“Marketplace” means a physical or electronic place, including, but not limited to, a store, booth, internet website, catalog, television or radio broadcast, or a dedicated sales software application, where a marketplace seller facilitates the occupancy of a short-term rental for delivery in this state regardless of whether the short-term rental, marketplace seller, or marketplace has a physical presence in this state.(d)“Ordinance” refers to an ordinance of a local agency imposing a transient occupancy tax.(e)“Purchaser” means a person who is required to pay the transient occupancy tax and who uses a short-term rental facilitator to facilitate the occupation of a short-term rental within the jurisdiction of the local agency imposing the transient occupancy tax.(f)“Short-term rental” means the occupancy of a home, house, a room in a home or house, a campsite, or other lodging that is not a hotel in this state for a period of 30 consecutive days or less and under any other circumstances specified by the local agency in its ordinance that is facilitated by a short-term rental facilitator.(g)“Short-term rental facilitator” means a person or entity that facilitates for consideration, regardless of whether it is deducted as fees from the transaction, the occupancy of a short-term rental that is not owned by the person facilitating the rental, through a marketplace operated by the person or a related person or entity, and that does both of the following:(1)Directly or indirectly, through one or more related persons, engages in any of the following:(A)Transmits or otherwise communicates the offer or acceptance between the purchaser and the operator.(B)Owns or operates the infrastructure, electronic or physical, or technology that brings purchasers and operators together.(C)Provides a virtual currency that purchasers are allowed or required to use to facilitate the occupancy of a short-term rental from the operator.(D)Software development or research and development activities related to any of the activities described in paragraph (2), if such activities are directly related to facilitating short-term rentals.(2)Directly or indirectly, through one or more related persons, engages in any of the following activities with respect to facilitating short-term rentals:(A)Payment processing services.(B)Listing homes, houses, or rooms in homes or houses, campsites, or other lodgings that are not a hotel or motel, and that are not owned by that person or a related person, for rental on a short-term basis.(C)Setting prices.(D)Branding short-term rentals as those of the short-term rental facilitator.(E)Taking orders or reservations.(h)“Transient Occupancy Tax” means a tax imposed by a local agency on the privilege of occupying a short-term rental as specified and defined by the local agency in its ordinance.